Utah statutes.
48-3a-1207.   Events causing dissociation from a series.

(1)  Unless otherwise provided in the operating agreement, a member ceases to be associated with a series and to have the power to exercise a right or power of a member with respect to the series upon the assignment of all of the member's transferable interest in the limited liability company with respect to the series.

(2)  Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement, an event under this chapter or the operating agreement that causes a member to cease to be associated with a series does not, by itself:

(a)  cause the member to cease to be associated with another series;

(b)  terminate the continued membership of a member in the limited liability company; or

(c)  cause the termination of the series, regardless of whether the member is the last remaining member associated with the series.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

